Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,207
Snowmobiles; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 60-3,207 to 60-3,219:

(1) Dealer means any person engaged in the business of selling snowmobiles at wholesale or retail;

(2) Manufacturer means a person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation engaged in the business of manufacturing snowmobiles; and

(3) Operate means to ride in or on and control the operation of a snowmobile.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 207.